North Carolina, session 2025, HB414.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115D-5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(x1) The State Board of Community Colleges shall collaborate with the State Board of
Education to develop a series of courses to be offered at community colleges that align with the
English, science, social studies, and mathematics graduation requirements developed by the State
Board of Education to be attended by high school students dually enrolled in a community college
and other community college students. The courses shall be organized so that one community
college course completion grants one full high school credit to fulfill a corresponding graduation
requirement while continuing to align with Career and College Promise. Completion of courses
developed pursuant to this subsection does not constitute a completion of any end-of-course tests
required to graduate."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-12 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(41a) To collaborate with the State Board of Community Colleges to align
graduation requirements with community college courses. – The State Board
of Education shall collaborate with the State Board of Community Colleges,
pursuant to G.S. 115D-5(x1)."
SECTION 2. The State Board of Community Colleges, in collaboration with the
State Board of Education, shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee
by January 15, 2026, on the results of the collaboration pursuant to Section 1 of this act. The
report shall include the following:
(1) A list of which community college courses will align with which high school
graduation requirements.
(2) A plan to continue to align community college courses that are attended by
students participating in the Career and College Promise program or any other
program that allows students to dually enroll with the corresponding high
school graduation requirements.
SECTION 3.(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, and continuing until
the State Board of Community Colleges and the State Board of Education complete the
requirements of Sections 1 and 2 of this act, completion of the following community college
courses by students participating in Career and College Promise is deemed completion of the
corresponding high school course:
*H414-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) BIO 111 – General Biology I or BIO 112 – General Biology II satisfies the
Biology requirement.
(2) CHM 151 – General Chemistry I, CHM 152 – General Chemistry II, PHY 151
– College Physics I, PHY 152 – College Physics II, PHY 251 – General
Physics I, or PHY 252 – General Physics II satisfies the physical science
requirement.
(3) ENG 111 – Writing and Inquiry, ENG 231 – American Literature I, or ENG
241 – British Literature I satisfies the English III requirement.
(4) ENG 112 – Writing/Research in the Disciplines, ENG 232 – American
Literature II, or ENG 242 – British Literature II satisfies the English IV
requirement.
(5) HIS 111 – World Civilizations I or HIS 112 – World Civilizations II satisfies
the World History requirement.
(6) MAT 143 – Quantitative Literacy, MAT 152 – Statistical Methods I, MAT
171 – Pre-calculus Algebra, MAT 172 – Pre-calculus Trigonometry, MAT
175 – Precalculus, MAT 263 – Brief Calculus, MAT 271 – Calculus I, or MAT
272 – Calculus II satisfies the Math III and fourth math requirements.
SECTION 3.(b) If the State Board of Community Colleges and the State Board of
Education satisfy the requirements of Sections 1 and 2 of this act by January 15 of an academic
year, the courses developed pursuant to G.S. 115D-5(x1), as enacted by this act, shall be offered
beginning with the following academic year.
SECTION 3.(c) Completion of any of the courses listed in subsection (a) of this
section does not constitute a completion of any end-of-course tests required to graduate.
SECTION 3.(d) This section expires upon satisfaction of the requirements of
Sections 1 and 2 of this act.
SECTION 4.(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt a rule to require
completion of an end-of-course test for NC Math 2 and not require completion of an
end-of-course test for NC Math 3.
SECTION 4.(b) The State Board of Education shall adopt a rule to modify the high
school graduation requirements to require completion of NC Math 1 and 2 and two additional
math courses that align with the student's postsecondary plans and to require that NC Math 3 and
all other existing math courses shall continue to be offered by all high schools to the extent that
there is sufficient student interest.
SECTION 4.(c) The State Board of Education may adopt emergency rules in
accordance with G.S. 150B-21.1A to implement the provisions of this act prior to the start of the
2025-2026 school year.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 414-First Edition